Maryland, session 2025, SB0971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0971*

SENATE BILL 971
Article – Health – General
3–306.
(a) Except as provided by agreement between the Secretary and the local
governing body, and in addition to the powers and duties set forth elsewhere, each health
officer has the powers and duties set forth in this section.
(b) A health officer may obtain samples of food and drugs for analysis.
(c) (1) The health officer for a county is the executive officer and secretary of
the county board of health.
(2) (I) Except in Montgomery County, the health officer for a county
shall appoint the staff of the county health department.
(II) IF A POSITION WITH A COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT IS
FULLY FUNDED THROUGH THE USE OF LOCAL FUNDING OR GRANT FUNDING, THE
HEALTH OFFICER FOR THE COUNTY MAY APPOINT AN INDIVIDUAL TO THE POSITION
WITHOUT APPROVAL BY THE SECRETARY OR THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT.
(3) The health officer for a county shall have an office at an accessible place
in the county.
(4) (i) The health officer for a county shall enforce throughout the
county:
1. Under the direction of the Secretary, the State health laws
and the policies, rules, and regulations that the Secretary adopts; and
2. Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
under the direction of the county board of health, the rules and regulations that the county
board of health adopts.
(ii) The health officer for a county shall enforce in each municipality
or special taxing district in the county the rules or regulations that the county board of
health adopts unless the municipality or district has a charter provision or ordinance that:
1. Covers the same subject matter as the county rule or
regulation;
2. Is at least as restrictive as the county rule or regulation;
and

SENATE BILL 971 3
3. Includes provisions for enforcement.
(5) A health officer shall perform any investigation or other duty or
function directed by the Secretary or the county board of health and submit appropriate
reports to them.
(d) (1) Subject to the consent of the governing body of the county and the
written approval of the Secretary, a health officer for a county may enter into a contract or
any other written agreement to assist or participate in the delivery of health care services
with a person that is authorized to provide, finance, coordinate, facilitate, or otherwise
deliver health care services in the State.
(2) IF THE SECRETARY DOES NOT RESPOND TO A REQUEST FOR
WRITTEN APPROVAL WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE REQUEST, THE HEALTH
OFFICER FOR THE COUNTY MAY PROCEED TO ENTER THE CONTRACT OR WRITTEN
AGREEMENT.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a health officer
for a county and the Baltimore City Commissioner of Health may authorize the county
health department to retain all collections, including any unspent balance at the end of a
fiscal year, received from:
(i) Fees authorized under this article;
(ii) Fees authorized under the Environment Article; and
(iii) Fees derived from charges authorized under Title 16, Subtitle 2
of this article.
(2) The authority to retain collections under paragraph (1) of this
subsection does not apply:
(i) To license fees set by a county governing body or Baltimore City
and paid to the chief financial officer of the county or Baltimore City as authorized under
State law;
(ii) To fees that must be transferred to the General Fund under §
4–217(c) of this article from the fees collected for each birth certificate issued or report
issued that a search was made but the requested record is not on file; or
(iii) If the retention of collections would be inconsistent with
established local practice.
(3) Each health officer for a county and the Baltimore City Commissioner
of Health shall report annually to the Secretary on the use of collections retained under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.

SENATE BILL 971
(F) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A HEALTH
OFFICER FOR A COUNTY MAY SERVE ON THE BOARD OF A HOSPITAL IN THE STATE IF
THE HEALTH OFFICER DOES NOT ACCEPT PAYMENT FOR THE HEALTH OFFICER’S
SERVICE ON THE BOARD.
(G) IF THE DEPARTMENT PROCURES A SYSTEM FOR COLLECTING AND
STORING ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS, AS DEFINED UNDER § 19–142 OF THIS
ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY EACH HEALTH OFFICER FOR A COUNTY
AND OFFER THE COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT THE OPPORTUNITY TO JOIN THE
PROCUREMENT.
[(f)] (H) The Secretary may delegate duties, powers, and functions as provided
in this article to a health officer for a county or other county official authorized to
administer and enforce health and environmental laws.
SUBTITLE 25. HEALTH CARE WORKFORCE DATA CLEARINGHOUSE.
24–2501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE” MEANS THE STAFF OF:
(1) THE PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES ADMINISTRATION;
(2) A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT; OR
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT WHO FOCUS ON
COMMUNITY AND POPULATION HEALTH EFFORTS.
24–2502.
IF THE DEPARTMENT CREATES A HEALTH CARE WORKFORCE DATA
CLEARINGHOUSE, THE CLEARINGHOUSE SHALL INCLUDE DATA RELATED TO THE
PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.